California, session 20252026, AB1153.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 48503 is added to the Public Resources Code, immediately following Section 48502, to read:48503. (a) The department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, may develop regulations and expend funds for through grants and existing programs to support local enforcement agencies in any of the following:(1) The removal and disposal of an abandoned recreational vehicle, as defined in Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code.(2) The development of enforcement strategies.(3) The development of local enforcement teams and illegal dumping enforcement officers, as defined in Section 830.7 of the Penal Code.(b) When implementing this section, the department shall prioritize projects in disadvantaged communities, as described in Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.